District of Columbia statutes.
23-705

Removal proceedings and returns to foreign countries not affected.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall repeal, modify, or in any way affect existing law concerning the procedure for the return of any person apprehended in the District of Columbia to a Federal judicial district to answer a Federal charge, or repeal, modify, or affect existing law or treaty concerning the return to a foreign country of a person apprehended or detained in the District of Columbia as a fugitive from a foreign country.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 633, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
1981 Ed., § 23-705.
1973 Ed., § 23-705.